Hawaii statutes.
§334-8 Agreements. In carrying out the
director’s duties under this chapter:

(1) The director of health may enter into agreements
with the United States and with other state departments, agencies, and
political subdivisions and enter into assistance agreements for services with a
profit organization incorporated under the laws of the State or a nonprofit
organization determined to be exempt from the federal income tax by the
Internal Revenue Service and allocate and expend any funds appropriated for the
purposes of such agreements and do all things necessary to accomplish the
purposes and provisions thereof.

(2) The director shall establish standards and review
procedures to assure that recipients of state funding provide the services and
facilities necessary to accomplish the purposes for which the funds are
provided. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-8; am L 1984, c 78, §1 and c 218,
§4; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next